Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB117.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 64.5277 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 64.5277 to 64.5279:
(1) "City" means:
(a) Any city of any class;
(b) An urban-county government that does not participate in the county officers
training program under KRS 64.5275; and
(c) A consolidated local government that does not participate in the county
officers training program under KRS 64.5275;
(2) "City officer" means:
(a) Any individual elected to a city office existing under KRS Chapter 83A;
(b) Any individual elected to a city office existing under KRS Chapter 67A or
67C, if the respective government does not participate in the county officers
training program under KRS 64.5275;
(c) Any individual appointed to fill a vacancy in an elected city office as defined
under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection; and
(d) Any individual serving in a nonelected city office as defined by KRS 83A.080
that is designated by the city as eligible for participation in the city officers
training program in the ordinance adopted pursuant to KRS 64.5278;
(3) "Excess credit hours" means credit hours earned beyond fifteen (15) during a
calendar year;
(4) "Training incentive multiplier" means a number of one (1) to four (4) that is used to
calculate the final training incentive to be paid to a city officer eligible to participate
in the training incentive program; and
(5)[(4)] "Training unit" means fifteen (15) clock hours of attendance or participation
in qualifying courses during a calendar year.
Page 1 of 3
BR156300.100 - 1563 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1563
Section 2. KRS 64.5278 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any city may elect, by adopting an ordinance meeting the requirements of this
section, to establish an incentive program for city officers to obtain educational
training related to their duties and responsibilities as city officers and the functions
of city governments.
(2) The ordinance shall apply to all elected city officers within the city, and the city
may allow any nonelected city officer holding an office existing or created under
KRS 83A.080 to participate in the incentive program.
(3) The ordinance shall establish[designate] a base [training ]incentive [payment
]amount that shall be awarded to the city officer for the completion of a training
unit during service as a city officer within the city. The city may establish a
different[This] base incentive [payment ]amount for each type of city officer
covered under the ordinance[shall be no less than one hundred dollars ($100) and
no more than five hundred dollars ($500)]. The base[training] incentive [payment
]amount established in the ordinance shall not be adjusted by any index reporting
changes to consumer prices or any other method to account for inflation.
(4) The ordinance shall require city officers to complete a number of continuing
education hours equal to at least one (1) training unit during each calendar year in
order to receive a training incentive payment.
(5) The ordinance shall state that the city shall award the training incentive payment to
the city officer for the completion of a training unit during the calendar year. The
training incentive payment awarded shall be the base [training ]incentive
amount[payment] multiplied by the training incentive multiplier earned by the city
officer. The city officer shall accumulate no more than one (1) training incentive
multiplier per calendar year of continuous service, for a maximum of four (4)
training incentive multipliers.
(6) The ordinance shall provide that a city officer who fails to earn at least one (1)
Page 2 of 3
BR156300.100 - 1563 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1563
training unit in any calendar year shall receive no training incentive payment for
that calendar year and shall have his or her training incentive multiplier reset to one
(1) for the following year.
(7) The ordinance may permit the city officer to carry forward no more than fifteen
(15) hours of excess credit hours earned in one (1) calendar year to apply to the
minimum fifteen (15) hours training unit required in the next calendar year.[
"Excess hours" means credit hours earned beyond fifteen (15) during a single
calendar year.]
(8) The ordinance shall require the city officer to present proof of his or her completion
of the annual training unit and shall establish the time that the city officers shall
receive their training incentive payments.
(9) Each city shall, in the ordinance establishing the city officers training program,
establish a policy regarding the reimbursement to the city officer, or payment to the
provider for the city officer's attendance of an event hosting a course where the
officer seeks to earn credit.
(10) The ordinance shall specify criteria for the presentation of proof of attendance by
city officers and the criteria for the evaluation of a course's relevance to the duties
and functions of city officers and the functions of city governments. In addition to
other courses that may be deemed relevant by the city, courses that provide
instruction on statutory powers and duties of cities and city officers,
intergovernmental relationships, municipal finance and budgeting, municipal
taxation, ethics, open records, open meetings, economic development, or municipal
police powers shall satisfy the criteria established in the ordinance.
Page 3 of 3
BR156300.100 - 1563 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:54 PM Jacketed